Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2634.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Study committee on educator health insurance costs; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The study committee on educator health insurance costs is established consisting of the following members: 1. A representative from a health insurance trust that provides health insurance to school districts in this state. This member is appointed by the president of the senate. 2. A representative from a school district that provides its own health insurance to its employees. This member is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 3. A teacher from a rural school district who is appointed by a statewide organization representing teachers. 4. A teacher from an urban school district who is appointed by a statewide organization representing teachers. 5. Two school district superintendents, one from a rural school district and one from an urban school district, who are appointed by a school administrators association in this state that works with students, teachers, parents and the community to make schools in this state safe, welcoming, collaborative and effective learning environments for all students. 6. Two representatives from school district governing boards, one from a rural school district governing board and one from an urban school district governing board, who are appointed by a school board association in this state that provides training, leadership and essential services to public school governing boards statewide. 7. A classified school district employee who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. B. The study committee on educator health insurance costs shall: 1. Examine the costs to both school districts and school district employees that are associated with providing health insurance to both school district employees and their dependents.  The study committee may examine plans that are currently offered by school districts in this state. 2. Recommend ways in which high quality health insurance that covers both employees and their dependents can be provided to both school district employees and their dependents in a manner that is affordable to both school districts and school district employees. 3. Submit a report regarding the study committee's activities, findings and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives on or before November 1, 2027 and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. C. This section is repealed from and after October 31, 2028.